FST Assignment 2/sources/cat3.regex
!replace the ending letter 'u' with respective char
[s -> s s || _ u .#.]
.o.
[q -> q q || _ u .#.]
.o.
[k -> k k || _ u .#.]
.o.
[m -> m m || _ u .#.]
.o.
[n -> n n || _ u .#.]
.o.
[l -> l l || _ u .#.]
;
